Utah statutes.
78B-8-602.   Proof of ownership required to harvest or transport forest
products or native vegetation -- Requirements for proof of ownership.
(1)  It is unlawful for any person, firm, company, partnership, corporation,
or business to harvest or transport timber, forest products, or other native
vegetation without proof of ownership.
(2)  Proof of ownership requires possession of:
(a)  a contract, permit, or other writing issued by the landowner or proper
state or federal agency;
(b)  a bill of sale, or other sales receipt;
(c)  a bill of lading or product load receipt;
(d)  a ticket issued by the seller authorizing harvesting or removal; or
(e)  any other legal instrument.
(3)  The document required in Subsection (1) shall be issued by the landowner
or proper state or federal agency and shall provide the following information:
(a)  date of execution;
(b)  name and address of person authorized to harvest or transport the
products, if different from the purchaser;
(c)  a legal or other sufficient description of the property from which the
products are harvested or removed;
(d)  the estimated amount or volume, species, and other pertinent information
regarding the products harvested or transported;
(e)  the delivery or scaling point;
(f)  the name and address of the purchaser of the products;
(g)  the name and address of the landowner, agency, or vendor; and
(h)  an expiration date.
